Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-807
Board members; interest in contracts prohibited.

No member of the board of public works of a city of the second class shall ever be financially interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract entered into by the board on behalf of the city for more than ten thousand dollars in one year.

Laws 1935, c. 33, § 5, p. 140;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-705;

R.S.1943, § 17-807;

Laws 1973, LB 24, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 236.